Washington statutes.
RCW 43.176.901

Services dependent on legislative funding.

The department of commerce shall have no duty to provide services related to the small business incubator and entrepreneurship assistance act of 2004 unless and until the small business incubator program and related administrative expenses are funded by the legislature.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2067; 2004 c 237 s 6.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.